apertium-tg-fa.tg.dix
    <pardef n="S__nominal_V_verb">
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p><par n="S__ind_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p><par n="S__iza_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p><par n="S__possess_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ву</l><r><j/>ва<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>нда</l><r><j/>анда<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__nominal_C">
      <!-- Clitics that can be added to nominals 
           Morphotactics: stem + (number)? + (definite)? + (object)?
        -->
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p><par n="S__ind_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p><par n="S__iza_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p><par n="S__possess_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>у</l><r><j/>ва<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>анда</l><r><j/>анда<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><j/>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="clt"/></r></p><par n="S__будан"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__nominal_V">
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p><par n="S__ind_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p><par n="S__iza_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p><par n="S__possess_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ву</l><r><j/>ва<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>нда</l><r><j/>анда<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><j/>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="clt"/></r></p><par n="S__будан"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__adject_C">
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p><par n="S__ind_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><j/>и<s n="enc"/><s n="izo"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><j/>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="clt"/></r></p><par n="S__будан"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>у</l><r><j/>ва<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="S__possess_V"/></e> <!-- p. 114 -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__adject_V">
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p><par n="S__ind_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><j/>и<s n="enc"/><s n="izo"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ву</l><r><j/>ва<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><j/>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="clt"/></r></p><par n="S__будан"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="S__possess_C"/></e> <!-- p. 114 -->
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->
    <pardef n="имрӯз__adv">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="куҷо__adv">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adpositions -->
    <pardef n="дар__pr">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="баро/и__pr">
      <e>       <p><l>и</l><r>и<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>я</l><r>и<s n="pr"/></r></p><par n="S__possess"/></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="барин__post">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->
    <pardef n="ва__cnjcoo">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ки__cnjsub">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="барои__cnjadv">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>       <re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>-сола</l><r>-сола<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
      <e>       <re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>-солагӣ</l><r>-солагӣ<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>-ум</l><r>-ум<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p><par n="S__adject_C"/></e>
      <e>       <re>[0-9]*[23]</re><p><l>-юм</l><r>-юм<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p><par n="S__adject_C"/></e>
      <e>       <re>[0-9]+([., ][0-9]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <re>[0-9]+([., ][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>кг</l><r><b/>кг<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <re>([0-9]|[0-9][0-9]):[0-9][0-9]</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <re>([0-9]|[0-9][0-9]).[0-9][0-9].[0-9][0-9][0-9][0-9]</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="як__num">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ind_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ду__num">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="S__ind_V"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->
    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e>       <p><l>ман</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ту</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ӯ</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>вай</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>мо</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>шумо</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>онҳо</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ман</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>маро</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>ро<s n="enc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ту</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ӯ</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>вай</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>мо</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>шумо</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>онҳо</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ин__prn">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ҳо</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ҳо</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ҳеҷ__prn">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ҳама__prn">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="худ__prn">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><j/>и<s n="enc"/><s n="izo"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="S__possess_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="к/ӣ__prn">
      <e>       <p><l>ӣ</l><r>ӣ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>иҳо</l><r>ӣ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>иро</l><r>ӣ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><j/>ро<s n="enc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>иҳоро</l><r>ӣ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><j/>ро<s n="enc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="personal subject pronouns"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ин"><i>ин</i><par n="ин__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="он"><i>он</i><par n="ин__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="вай"><i>вай</i><par n="ин__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="худ"><i>худ</i><par n="худ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="кӣ"><i>к</i><par n="к/ӣ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳеҷ"><i>ҳеҷ</i><par n="ҳеҷ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳеҷ як"><i>ҳеҷ<b/>як</i><par n="ҳеҷ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳеҷ кас"><i>ҳеҷ<b/>кас</i><par n="ҳеҷ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳама"><i>ҳама</i><par n="ҳама__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ваё"><i>ваё</i><par n="ва__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ё ки"><i>ё<b/>ки</i><par n="ва__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="чи"><i>чи</i><par n="ва__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="на"><i>на</i><par n="ва__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="гоҳ"><i>гоҳ</i><par n="ва__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="аммо"><i>аммо</i><par n="ва__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="вале"><i>вале</i><par n="ва__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="лек"><i>лек</i><par n="ва__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="натанҳо"><i>натанҳо</i><par n="ва__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="азбаски"><i>дар<b/>мавриди</i><par n="ки__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="то ин ки"><i>то<b/>ин<b/>ки</i><par n="ки__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="баЪд аз он ки"><i>баЪд<b/>аз<b/>он<b/>ки</i><par n="ки__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳамин ки"><i>ҳамин<b/>ки</i><par n="ки__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ба ҷое ки"><i>ба<b/>ҷое<b/>ки</i><par n="ки__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳамон ҷо"><i>ҳамон<b/>ҷо</i><par n="ки__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="дар ҳолате ки"><i>дар<b/>ҳолате<b/>ки</i><par n="ки__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="гӯё ки"><i>гӯё<b/>ки</i><par n="ки__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="гарчанде ки"><i>гарчанде<b/>ки</i><par n="ки__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="барои"><i>барои</i><par n="барои__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="аз ин рӯ"><i>аз<b/>ин<b/>рӯ</i><par n="барои__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="барои"><i>баро</i><par n="баро/и__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="бино ба"><i>бино<b/>ба</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="мобайни"><i>мобайни</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="дар гирди"><i>дар<b/>гирди</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="аз миёни"><i>аз<b/>миёни</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="дар паҳлӯи"><i>дар<b/>паҳлӯи</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="дар таги"><i>дар<b/>таги</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="аз ҳангоми"><i>аз<b/>ҳангоми</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="аз сабаби"><i>аз<b/>сабаби</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="дар муддати"><i>дар<b/>муддати</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="барин"><i>барин</i><par n="барин__post"/></e>
    <e lm="боз"><i>боз</i><par n="барин__post"/></e>
    <e lm="як"><i>як</i><par n="як__num"/></e>
    <e lm="чор" r="LR"><p><l>чаҳор</l><r>чор</r></p><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳафт"><i>ҳафт</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ёздаҳ"><i>ёздаҳ</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="понздаҳ"><i>понздаҳ</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳабдаҳ" r="LR"><p><l>ҳафдаҳ</l><r>ҳабдаҳ</r></p><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="нӯздаҳ" r="LR"><p><l>нӯздаҳ</l><r>нуздаҳ</r></p><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="шаст"><i>шаст</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="як ҳазор"><i>як<b/>ҳазор</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ним"><i>ним</i><par n="як__num"/></e>
    <e lm="куҷо"><i>куҷо</i><par n="куҷо__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="кай"><i>кай</i><par n="куҷо__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="чаро"><i>чаро</i><par n="куҷо__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="тавр"><i>тавр</i><par n="куҷо__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="чӣ вақт"><i>чӣ<b/>вақт</i><par n="куҷо__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="чӣ тавр"><i>чӣ<b/>тавр</i><par n="куҷо__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="аз ҷумла"><i>аз<b/>ҷумла</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="инҷо"><i>инҷо</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="баъзан"><i>баъзан</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="зӯран"><i>зӯран</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="дар пеш"><i>дар<b/>пеш</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="байн"><i>байн</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="даррав"><i>даррав</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="рӯзона"><i>рӯзона</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="фавран"><i>фавран</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
      <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
